Ohio, session 136, HB1021.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 5534.475 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 5534.475. In addition to any other name prescribed in the Revised Code or otherwise, that portion of United States route number forty-two, running in a northeasterly and southwesterly direction, between the intersection of that route and state route number seventy-three and the intersection of that route and Roxanna New Burlington road, within Greene and Warren counties, shall be known as the "Deputy Chris Longfellow Memorial Highway." The director of transportation may erect suitable markers along the highway indicating its name.